I had, however, one misgiving. It seemed to me that I was better 
qualified for drawing than for painting, especially in the various branches of 
architectural drawing. At the same time my interest in architecture was 
constantly increasing, and I advanced in this direction at a still more rapid 
pace after my first visit to Vienna, which lasted two weeks. 


I was not yet sixteen years old. I went to the Hof Museum to study the 
paintings in the art gallery there; but the building itself captured almost all my 
interest. From early morning until late at night I spent all my time visiting the 
various public buildings, and it was the buildings themselves that were always 
the principal attraction for me. 


For hours and hours, I could stand in wonderment before the Opera and 
the Parliament House. The whole Ring Strasse had a magic effect upon me, as 
if it were a scene from the Arabian Nights. 


And now here I was for the second time in this beautiful city, impatiently 
waiting to hear the result of the entrance examination, but proudly confident 
that I had got through. I was so convinced of my success that when the news 
that I had failed to pass was brought to me, it struck me like a bolt from the 
blue. Yet the fact was that I had failed. 


I went to see the Rector and asked him to explain the reasons why they 
refused to accept me as a student in the general School of Painting, which was 
part of the Academy. He said that the sketches which I had brought with me 
showed unquestionably that painting was not what I was suited for, but that the 
same sketches gave clear indications of my aptitude for architectural designing. 


Therefore, the School of Painting did not come into question for me, but 
rather the School of Architecture, which also formed part of the Academy. 
They found it hard to believe that I had never been to a school for architecture 
and had never received any instruction in architectural designing. 


When I left the magnificent Hansen building, in the Schiller Platz, I was 
quite crestfallen. I felt at odds with myself for the first time in my young life, 
for what I had heard about my capabilities now appeared to me as a lightning 


33 


flash which clearly revealed a dualism under which I had been suffering for a 
long time, but for which I had hitherto been unable to account. Within a few 
days I myself also knew that I ought to become an architect, but of course the 
way was very difficult. 


I was now forced bitterly to rue my former conduct in neglecting and 
despising certain subjects at the Realschule. Before attending courses at the 
School of Architecture at the Academy it was necessary to attend the Technical 
College, but a necessary qualification for entrance to this College was a 
matriculation certificate gained at the higher grade school, which I did not 
possess. As far as one could foresee my dream of following an artistic calling 
seemed beyond the limits of possibility. 


After the death of my mother I went to Vienna for the third time. This 
visit was destined to last several years. Since I had been there before, I had 
recovered my old calm and resoluteness. My former self-assurance had come 
back, and I had my eyes steadily fixed on the goal. I was determined to be an 
architect. 


Obstacles are placed across our path in life, not to be boggled at, but to 
be surmounted, and I was fully determined to surmount these obstacles, having 
constantly before my mind the picture of my father, who had raised himself by 
his own efforts to the position of civil servant though he was the poor son of a 
village shoemaker. I had a better start, and the possibility of winning through 
was greater. 


At that time my lot in life seemed to me a harsh one; but to-day I see in it 
the wise workings of Providence. Adversity had me in its grip and often 
threatened to smash me; but the will grew stronger as the obstacles increased, 
and finally the will triumphed. 


I am thankful for that period of my life, because it hardened me and 
enabled me to be hard, and I am even more thankful because I appreciate the 
fact that I was thus saved from the emptiness of a life of ease and that a 
mother’s darling was taken from comfortable surroundings and handed over to 
Adversity as to a new mother. 


Though I then rebelled against it as too hard a fate, I am grateful that I 
was cast, against my wishes, into a world of misery and poverty and thus came 
to know the people for whom I was afterwards to fight. 


34 


It was during this period that my eyes were opened to two perils, the 
names of which I scarcely knew hitherto and had no notion whatsoever of their 
terrible significance for the existence of the German people. These two perils 
were Marxism and Judaism. 


For many people the name of Vienna signifies innocent jollity, a festive 
place for happy mortals. For me, alas, it is a living memory of the saddest 
period of my life. Even to-day, the mention of that city arouses only gloomy 
thoughts in my mind. 


The very name of that Phaeacian town spells five years of poverty—five 
years in which, first as a casual labourer and then as a poor painter, I had to 
earn my daily bread, and a meagre morsel indeed it was, not even sufficient to 
still the hunger which I constantly felt. 


That hunger was the faithful companion which never left me and shared 
in everything I did. Every book that I bought meant renewed hunger, and every 
visit I paid to the opera meant the intrusion of that inalienable companion 
during the days that followed. I was always struggling with my unsympathetic 
friend, and yet during that time I learned more than I had ever learned before. 


Apart from my architectural studies and rare visits to the opera, for 
which I had to deny myself food, I had no pleasure in life except my books. 


I read a great deal then, and I pondered deeply over what I read. All my 
free time after work was devoted exclusively to study. 


Thus, within a few years, I was able to acquire a stock of knowledge, 
which I find useful even to-day. But, over and above that, there formed in my 
mind during those years, an impression of life and a Weltanschauung. These 
became the granite basis of my conduct. I have had to add but little to what I 
then learned and made my own, and I have had to alter none of it. 


On the contrary, I am firmly convinced to-day that, generally speaking, it 
is in youth that men lay the essential groundwork of their creative thought, 
wherever that creative thought exists. 


I make a distinction between the wisdom of age—which can only arise 
from the greater profundity and foresight that are based on the experiences of a 
long life—and the creative genius of youth, which blossoms out in thought and 
ideas with inexhaustible fertility, without being able to digest these 
immediately, because of their very superabundance. 


Bis) 


These furnish the building materials and plans for the future, and it is 
from them that age takes the stones and builds the edifice, unless the so-called 
wisdom of the years has smothered the creative genius of youth. 


The life which I had hitherto led at home with my parents differed lithe 
from that of many others. I looked forward without apprehension to the 
morrow, and there was no such thing as a social problem to be faced. Those 
among whom I passed my young days belonged to the small bourgeois class. 


Therefore, it was a world that had very little contact with the world of 
genuine manual labourers, for, though at first this may appear astonishing, the 
gulf which separates that class, which is by no means economically well-off, 
from the manual labouring class is often deeper than people think. 


The reason for this division, which we may almost call enmity, lies in 
the fear that dominates a social group which has only just risen above the level 
of the manual labourer—a fear lest it may fall back into its old condition or at 
least be classed with the labourers. 


Moreover, there 1s something repulsive in remembering the cultural 
indigence of that lower class and their rough manners with one another; so that 
people who are only on the first rung of the social ladder find it unbearable to 
be forced to have any contact with the cultural level and standard of living 
beyond which they have passed. Thus, it happens that very often those who 
belong to what can really be called the upper classes find it much easier than 
do the upstarts to descend to and intermingle with their fellow-beings on the 
lowest social level, for, by the word upstart. 


I mean everyone who has raised himself through his own efforts to a 
social level higher than that to which he formerly belonged. In the case of such 
a person the hard struggle through which he has passed often destroys his 
innate human sympathy. His own fight for existence kills his sensibility to the 
misery of those who have been left behind. 


From this point of view Fate had been kind to me. Circumstances forced 
me to return to that world of poverty and economic insecurity above which my 
father had raised himself in his early days, and thus the blinkers of a narrow 
petit bourgeois education were torn from my eyes. Now for the first time I 
learned to know men and I learned to distinguish between an outer polish or 
coarse manners and the real inner nature of people. 


36 


At the beginning of the century Vienna already ranked among those cities 
where social conditions were iniquitous. Dazzling riches and loathsome 
destitution were to be found side by side. 


In the centre and in the Inner City one felt the pulse-beat of an Empire 
which had a population of fifty-two millions, with all the perilous charm of a 
State made up of multiple nationalities. 


The dazzling splendour of the Court acted like a magnet to the wealth and 
intelligence of the whole Empire, and this attraction was further strengthened 
by the centralising policy of the Habsburg monarchy itself. 


This centralising policy was necessary in order to hold together that 
hotch-potch of heterogeneous nationalities, but the result of it was an 
extraordinary concentration of higher officials in the city, which was at one and 
the same time the metropolis and imperial residence. 


Vienna was not merely the political and intellectual centre of the 
Danubian monarchy; it was also the industrial centre. In contrast to the vast 
number of military officers of high rank state officials, artists and scientists, 
there was the still vaster army of workers. Abject poverty rubbed shoulders 
with the wealth of the aristocracy and the merchant class. 


Thousands of unemployed loitered in front of the palaces on the Ring 
Strasse, and below that Via Triumphalis of the old Austria, the homeless 
huddled together in the murk and filth of the canals. 


There was hardly any other German city in which the social problem 
could be studied better than in Vienna. But here I must utter a warning against 
the illusion that this problem can be ‘studied’ from a higher social level. 


The man who has never been in the clutches of that gushing viper can 
never know what its poison is. An attempt to study it in any other way will 
result only in superficial talk and sentimental delusions. Both are harmful; the 
first, because it can never go to the root of the problem, the second, because it 
evades the question entirely. I do not know which is the more nefarious—to 
ignore social distress, as do the majority of those who have been favoured by 
fortune and those who have risen in the social scale through their own efforts, 
or the equally supercilious and often tactless, but always genteel, 
condescension displayed by people who have a craze for being charitable and 
who plume themselves on ‘sympathising with the people.’ 


37 


Of course such persons sin to a degree which they, with their lack of 
instinctive understanding, are, unable to realise, and thus they are astonished to 
find that the social conscience on which they pride themselves never produces 
any results, but often causes their good intentions to be resented, and then they 
talk of the ingratitude of the people. 


Such persons are slow to learn that social activity is something very 
different and that they cannot expect gratitude since they are not distributing 
favours, but establishing rights. I was protected against the temptation to study 
the social question in the way just mentioned, for the simple reason that I was 
forced to suffer myself. 


It was, therefore, not a question of studying the problem objectively, but 
rather one of testing its effects on myself. Though the rabbit came through the 
ordeal of the experiment, this must not be taken as evidence of its 
harmlessness. When I try to-day to recall the succession of impressions 
received during that time I find that I can do so only with approximate 
completeness. 


Here I shall describe only the more essential impressions and those 
which personally affected and often staggered me, and I shall mention the, few 
lessons I learned from this experience. At that time it was for the most part not 
very difficult to find work, because I had to seek work not as a skilled 
tradesman, but as a so-called extra-hand and had to be ready to take any job 
that turned up by chance, just for the sake of earning my daily bread. 


Thus I adopted the same attitude as, all those emigrants who shake the 
dust of Europe from their feet, with the cast-iron determination to lay the 
foundations of a new existence in the New World and acquire for themselves a 
new home. 


Liberated from all the paralysing prejudices of class and calling, 
environment and tradition, they enter any service that is open to them, 
accepting any work that comes their way, filled more and more with the idea 
that honest work never disgraced anybody, no matter what kind it may be. So I 
was resolved to enter what was for me a new world and make my way. 


I soon found out that there was always some kind of work to be got, but I 
also learned that it could just as quickly and easily be lost. The uncertainty of 
being able to earn a regular daily livelihood soon appeared to me the 
gloomiest feature in this new life upon which I had entered. 


38 


Although the skilled worker was not so frequently thrown idle as the 
unskilled worker, yet the former was by no means protected against the same 
fate; because though he might not have to face hunger as a result of 
unemployment due to the lack of demand on the labour market, the lock-out and 
the strike deprived the skilled worker of the chance to earn his bread. The 
element of uncertainty in earning one’s daily bread causes far-reaching and 
serious repercussions throughout the whole social-economic structure. 


The country lad who migrates to the big city feels attracted by what has 
been described as easy work (which it may be in reality) and shorter working 
hours and especially by the magic glamour of the big city. Accustomed in the 
country to earn a steady wage, he has been taught not to quit his former post 
until a new one is at least in view. 


As there is a great scarcity of agricultural labour, the probability of long 
unemployment in the country is very slight. It is mistake to assume that the lad 
who leaves the countryside for the town 1s not made of such sound material as 
those who remain at home to work on the land. 


On the contrary, experience shows that it is the more healthy and more 
vigorous that emigrate, and not the reverse. Among these emigrants I include 
not merely those who emigrate to America, but also the farm-hand who decides 
to leave his native village and migrate to the big city, where he will be a 
stranger. He is ready to take the risk of an uncertain fate. 


In most cases, he comes to town with a little money in his pocket and for 
the first few days he is not discouraged if he should not have the good fortune 
to find work, but if he finds a job and then loses it in a little while, the case is 
much worse. 


To find work anew, especially in winter, is often difficult and indeed 
sometimes impossible. 


For the first few weeks life is still bearable. He receives his out-of- 
work money from his trade-union and is thus enabled to carry on. But when the 
last of his own money 1s gone and his trade-union ceases to pay out because of 
prolonged unemployment, then comes real distress. He now loiters about and 
is hungry. 


Often he pawns or sells the last of his belongings. His clothes begin to 
get shabby and with the increasing shabbiness of his outward appearance he 


39 


descends to a lower social level and, in addition to his physical misery, now 
mixes with a class of human beings through whom his mind becomes poisoned. 


When he has nowhere to sleep, and if this happens in winter, as is very 
often the case, he is in dire distress. Finally he gets work, but the same story 
repeats itself a second time, then a third time, and now it is probably much 
worse. Little by little, he becomes indifferent to this everlasting insecurity. 
Finally he grows used to the repetition. 


Thus, even a man who is normally of industrious habits grows careless 
in his whole attitude towards life and gradually becomes an instrument in the 
hands of unscrupulous people who exploit him for the sake of their own 
ignoble aims. 


He has been so often thrown out of employment through no fault of his 
own that he is now more or less indifferent as to whether the strike in which he 
takes part is for the purpose of securing his economic rights or is aimed at the 
destruction of the State, the whole social order and even civilisation itself. 
Though the idea of going on strike may not be to his liking, yet he joins in out 
of sheer indifference. 


I saw this process happen before my eyes in thousands of cases and the 
longer I observed it, the greater became my dislike for that mammoth city 
which greedily attracts men to its bosom, in order to break them mercilessly in 
the end. When they came they still felt themselves in communion with their 
own people at home; if they remained that tie was broken. 


I was so buffeted about by life in the metropolis that I myself tasted the 
physical experience of such a lot and felt the effects of 1t in my own soul. One 
other thing became clear to me. The sudden change from work to idleness and 
vice versa and the constant fluctuation thus caused between earning and 
expenditure finally destroyed the sense of thrift in many people and also the 
habit of regulating expenditure in an intelligent way. 


The body appeared to grow accustomed to vicissitude, eating heartily in 
good times and going hungry in bad. Indeed hunger shatters all plans for 
regulating expenditure in better ttmes when employment has again been found. 


The reason for this is that the deprivations which the unemployed worker 
has to endure must be compensated for psychologically by a persistent mental 
mirage in which he imagines himself eating heartily once again, and this dream 


40 


develops into such a longing that it turns into a morbid impulse to cast off all 
self-restraint when work and wages turn up again. 


Therefore, the moment work is found anew he forgets to regulate the 
expenditure of his earnings but spends them to the full without thinking of the 
morrow. This leads to confusion even in the little weekly housekeeping budget, 
because the expenditure is not carefully planned. At first, the earnings will last 
perhaps for five days instead of seven; on subsequent occasions they will last 
only for three; as the habit grows, the earnings will last scarcely for a day, and 
finally they will disappear in one night. 


Often there are a wife and children at home, and in many cases it 
happens that these become infected by such a way of living, especially if the 
husband is good to them and loves them in his own way and according to his 
own lights. Then the week’s earnings are spent in common at home within two 
or three days. 


The family eats and drinks together as long as the money lasts and at the 
end of the week they hunger together. Then the wife wanders about furtively in 
the neighbourhood, borrows, a little and runs up small debts with the, 
shopkeepers, in an effort to pull through the lean days towards the end of the 
week. They sit down together to the midday meal, with only meagre fare on the 
table and often even nothing to eat. 


They wait for the corning pay-day, talking of it and making plans; and 
while they are thus hungry they dream of the plenty that is to come, and so the 
little children become acquainted with misery in their early years. 


The evil culminates when the husband goes his own way from the 
beginning and the wife protests, simply out of love for the children. 


Then there are quarrels and bad feeling and the husband takes to drink as 
he becomes more and more estranged from his wife. He now becomes drunk 
every Saturday. Fighting for her own existence and that of the children, the 
wife has to dog his footsteps on the road from the factory to the tavern in order 
to get a few shillings from him on pay-day. 


Then when he finally comes home, maybe on the Sunday or the Monday, 
having parted with his last pence, terrible scenes take place. I have had actual 
experience of all this in hundreds of cases. At first I was disgusted and 
indignant, but later on I came to recognise the whole tragedy of their misfortune 


41 


and to understand the profound causes of it. They were the unhappy victims of 
evil circumstances. 


Housing conditions were very bad at that time. In Vienna manual 
labourers lived in surroundings of appalling misery. I shudder even to-day 
when I think of the woeful dens in which people dwelt, the night-shelters and 
the slums, and all the tenebrous spectacles of ordure, loathsome filth and 
wickedness. What will happen one day when hordes of emancipated slaves 
come forth from these dens of misery to swoop down on their unthinking 
fellows? 


For unthinking they certainly are. Unthinkingly they allow things to go on 
as they are, little, dreaming, in their insensibility, that the day of reckoning must 
inevitably come, unless Fate is appeased betimes. 


To-day I thank Providence for having sent me to, such a school. There I 
could not refuse to take an interest in matters that did not please me. This 
school soon taught me a profound lesson. 


In order not to despair completely of the people among whom I then 
lived I had to differentiate between their outward appearance and their way of 
living, on the one hand, and the reasons for their development, on the other. 


Then I could bear everything without discouragement, for those who 
emerged from all this misfortune and misery, from this filth and outward 
degradation, were not human beings as such, but rather the lamentable results 
of lamentable laws. In my own life similar hardships prevented me from giving 
way to a pitying sentimentality at the sight of these degraded products which 
had finally resulted from the pressure of circumstances. The sentimental 
attitude would have been the wrong one to adopt. 


Even in those days I already saw that there was a two-fold method by 
which alone it would be possible to bring about an amelioration of these 
conditions, namely, to awaken a profound sense of social responsibility for the 
creation of a better basis for our future development, combined with a ruthless 
determination to prune away all incorrigible outgrowths. 


Just as Nature concentrates her attention, not on the preservation of what 
already exists, but on the selective breeding of offspring in order to carry on 
the species, so in human life also it is less a matter of artificially improving the 
existing generation (which, owing to human characteristics, 1s impossible in 


42 


ninety-nine cases out of a hundred), but more of securing from the very start a 
better road for future development. 


During my struggle for existence in Vienna I perceived, very clearly that 
the aim of all social activity must never be merely charitable relief, which is 
ridiculous and useless, but it must rather be a means to find a way of 
eliminating the fundamental deficiencies in our economic and cultural life, 
deficiencies which necessarily bring about the degradation of the individual or 
at least lead him towards such degradation. 


The difficulty of employing any means, even the most drastic, to 
overcome the hostility towards the State prevailing among certain criminal 
classes is largely due to an attitude of uncertainty regarding the inner motives 
and causes of this contemporary phenomenon. 


The reasons for this uncertainty are to be found ina sense of guilt for 
having permitted this tragedy of degradation. That feeling paralyses every 
serious and firm resolve and so contributes to the vacillating, and therefore 
weak and ineffectual, application of even those measures which are 
indispensable for self-preservation. 


When an age is no longer burdened with its own consciousness of blame 
in this regard, then and only then, will it have that inner tranquillity and outer 
strength necessary to cut off drastically and ruthlessly all parasite growth and 
root out the weeds. Because the Austrian State had almost no sense of social 
right or social legislation its inability to abolish those evil outgrowths was 
manifest. 


I do not know what appalled me most at that time; the economic misery 
of those who were, then my companions, their crude customs and morals, or 
the low level of their culture. 


How often does our bourgeoisie rise up in moral indignation on hearing 
from the mouth of some pitiable tramp that it 1s all the same to him whether he 
be a German or not, and that he will feel at home wherever he can get enough 
to keep body and soul together. They bewail such a lack of ‘national pride’ and 
express their horror at such sentiments. But how many people really ask 
themselves why it is that their own sentiments are better? 


How many of them understand that their natural pride in being members 
of so favoured a nation arises from the innumerable succession of instances 


43 


they have encountered which remind them of the greatness of their country and 
their nation in all spheres of artistic and cultural life? How many of them 
realise that pride in their country is largely dependent on knowledge of its 
greatness in all those spheres? 


Do our bourgeois circles ever think what a ridiculously meagre share the 
people have in that knowledge which 1s a necessary prerequisite for the feeling 
of pride in one’s country? 


It cannot be objected here that in other countries similar conditions exist 
and that nevertheless the working classes in those countries have remained 
patriotic. Even if that were so, it would be no excuse for our negligent, 
attitude, but it is not so. What we call chauvinistic education—in the case of 
the French people, for example is only the excessive exaltation of the greatness 
of France in all spheres of culture or, as the French say, civilisation. 


The French boy is not educated on purely objective principles. 
Wherever the importance of the political and cultural greatness of his country 
is concerned, he is taught in the most subjective way imaginable. Education 
ought always to be on broad, general lines and these ought to be deeply 
engraved, by constant repetition if necessary, on the memories and feelings of 
the people. In our case, however, we are not merely guilty of sins of omission, 
but also of positively perverting the little which some individuals had the luck 
to learn at school. The rats that poison our body politic gnaw from the hearts 
and memories of the broad masses even that little which distress and misery 
have left. 


Let the reader try to picture the following: 


There is a lodging in a cellar and this lodging consists of two damp 
rooms. In these rooms a workman and his family live seven people in all. Let 
us assume that one of the children is a boy of three. That is the age at which 
children, first become conscious of the impressions which they receive. In the 
case of highly gifted people traces of the impressions received in those early 
years remain in the memory up to an advanced age. 


Now, the narrowness and congestion of those living quarters are not 
conducive to pleasant relations and thus quarrels and fits of mutual anger arise. 
These people can hardly be said to live with one another, but rather on top of 
one another. The small misunderstandings which disappear of themselves ina 
home where there is enough space for people to get away from one another for 


44 


a while, here become the source of chronic disputes. As far as the children are 
concerned the situation is tolerable from this point of view. 


In such conditions, they are constantly quarrelling with one another, but 
the quarrels are quickly and easily forgotten, but when the parents fall out with 
one another daily bickerings often develop into rudeness; such as cannot be 
adequately imagined. The results of such experiences must become apparent 
later on in the children. 


One must have practical experience of such a milieu in order to be able 
to picture the state of affairs that arises from such mutual recriminations when 
the father assaults the mother and maltreats her in a fit of drunken rage. 


At the age of six the unfortunate child begins to be aware of sordid facts 
which an adult would find revolting infected with moral poison, 
undernourished in body and with its poor little head alive with vermin, the 
young ‘citizen’ goes to the primary school. With difficulty he barely learns to 
read and write. There is no possibility of learning any lessons at home. 


On the contrary, the father and mother themselves talk before the children 
in the most disparaging way about the teacher and the school and they are much 
more inclined to insult the teachers than to put their offspring across their knee 
and knock sound reason into him. 


What the little fellow hears at home does not tend to increase his respect 
for his human surroundings. Here nothing good is said of human nature as a 
whole and every institution, from the school to the government, is reviled. No 
matter what the subject, religion or morals, the State or the social order, they 
rail against them all and drag them down into the dirt. 


When the lad leaves school, at the age of fourteen, it would be difficult 
to say what are the most striking features of his character, incredible ignorance 
in so far as real knowledge is concerned or cynical impudence combined with 
an attitude towards morality which is really startling in one so young. 


What position can a person fill in the world which he is about to enter, if 
to him nothing is sacred, if he has never come into contact with anything noble 
but, on the contrary, has been intimately acquainted with the lowest kind of 
human existence? 


The child of three has got into the habit of reviling all authority by the 
time he is fifteen. He has been acquainted only with moral filth and vileness, 


45 


everything being excluded that might stimulate his thoughts towards higher 
things. Now this young specimen of humanity enters the school of life. 


He leads the same kind of life which was exemplified for him by his 
father during his childhood. He loiters about the streets and comes home at all 
hours. He even blackguards that broken-hearted being who gave him birth. 


He curses God and the world and finally ends up in a reformatory for 
young people where he acquires the final polish, and his bourgeois 
contemporaries are astonished at the lack of ‘patriotic enthusiasm’ which this 
young ‘citizen’ displays. 


Day after day the bourgeois world sees how poison is spread among the 
people through the medium of the theatre, the cinema, gutter journalism and 
obscene books, and yet they are astonished at the deplorable ‘moral standards’ 
the ‘lack of national feeling’ among the masses—as if the overdone 
sentimentality of the cinema, rubbishy papers and suchlike could lay a 
foundation for recognition of the greatness of one’s country, apart entirely from 
the earlier education which the individual has received. 


I then came to understand, quickly and thoroughly, what I had never been 
aware of before, namely, that the question of ‘nationalizing’ a people is first 
and foremost one of establishing sound social conditions which will furnish the 
foundation necessary for the education of the individual, for only when family 
upbringing and school education have inculcated upon the mind of the 
individual a knowledge of the cultural and economic and, above all, of the 
political greatness of his own country—then, and then only, will it be possible 
for him to feel proud of being a citizen of that country. 


I can fight only for something that I love. I can love only what I respect, 
and in order to respect a thing I must at least have some knowledge of it. 


As soon as my interest in social questions was once awakened I began to 
study them thoroughly. A new and hitherto unknown world was thus revealed to 
me. 


In the years 1909-10, I had so far improved my position that I no longer 
had to earn my daily bread as a manual labourer. I was now working 
independently in a small way, as a painter in water colours. This métier was a 
poor one indeed as far as earnings were concerned, for these were only 
sufficient to pay for the bare necessities of life, yet it had an interest for me, in 


46 


view of the profession to which I aspired. 


Moreover, when I came home in the evenings, I was now no longer 
dead-tired as formerly, when I used to be unable to open a book without falling 
asleep almost immediately. 


My present occupation was, therefore, in line with the profession I 
aimed at for the future. Moreover, I was master of my own time and could 
arrange my working-hours better than formerly. I painted in order to earn my 
bread, and I studied because I liked it. 


Thus I was able to acquire that theoretical knowledge of the social 
problem which was a necessary complement to what I was learning through 
actual experience. I studied all the books which I could find that dealt with this 
question and I thought deeply on what I read. I think that the people among 
whom I then lived considered me an eccentric person. 


Besides my interest in the social question I naturally devoted myself with 
enthusiasm to the study of architecture. Side by side with music, I considered it 
queen of the arts. To study it was for me not work but pleasure. I could read or 
draw into the small hours of the morning without ever getting tired, and I 
became more and more confident that my dream of a brilliant future would 
come true, even though I should have to wait long years for its fulfilment. I was 
firmly convinced that one day I should make a name for myself as an architect. 


The fact that, side by side with my professional studies, I took the 
greatest interest in everything that had to do with politics did not seem to me to 
signify anything of great importance. On the contrary, I looked upon this 
practical interest in politics merely as part of an elementary obligation that 
devolves on every thinking man. Those who have no understanding of the 
political world around them have no right to criticise or complain. 


On political questions, therefore, I still continued to read and study a 
great deal, but ‘reading’ had probably a different significance for me from that 
which it has for the average run of our so-called ‘intellectuals.’ 


I know people who read interminably, book after book, page after page, 
and yet I should not call them ‘well-read.’ Of course they ‘know’ an immense 
amount, but their brain seems incapable of assorting and classifying the 
material which they have gathered, from books. 


They have not the faculty of distinguishing between what is of value and 


47 


what is worthless in a book, in order that they may retain the former in their 
minds, and if possible, skip over the latter while reading or, if that be not 
possible, when once read, throw it overboard as useless ballast. 


Reading is not an end in itself, but a means to an end. Its chief purpose is 
to help towards filling in the framework which is made up of the talents and 
capabilities that each individual possesses. 


Thus each one procures for himself the implements and materials 
necessary for the fulfilment of his calling in life, no matter whether this be the 
elementary task of earning one’s daily bread or a career taken up in response to 
a higher call. 


Such is the first purpose of reading, and the second purpose is to give us 
a general knowledge of the world in which we live. In both cases, however, 
the material which we have acquired through reading must not be stored up in 
the memory on a plan that corresponds to the successive chapters of the book, 
but each little piece of knowledge thus gained must be treated as if it were a 
little stone to be inserted into a mosaic, so that it finds its proper place among 
all the other pieces and particles that help to forma general world-picture in 
the brain of the reader. 


Otherwise, only a confused jumble of chaotic notions will result from all 
reading, and this jumble is not merely useless, but it also tends to make the 
unfortunate possessor of it conceited, for he seriously considers himself a 
well-educated person and thinks that he understands something of life. 


He believes that he has acquired knowledge, whereas the truth is that 
every increase in such ‘knowledge’ draws him more and more away from real 
life, until he finally ends up in some sanatorium or takes to politics and 
becomes a member of parliament. 


Such a person never succeeds in turning his knowledge to practical 
account when the opportune moment arrives, for his mental equipment is not 
ordered according to the broad lines of human existence, but in the order of 
succession in which he read the books and their contents is stored in his mind. 


If Fate should one day call upon him to use some of his book-knowledge 
for certain practical purposes in life, Fate would have to name the book and 
give the number of the page, for the poor noodle himself would never be able 
to find the spot where he gathered the information now called for; but since the 


48 


page is not mentioned at, the critical moment the wise fool finds himself ina 
state of hopeless embarrassment. 


In a high state of agitation he searches for analogous cases and it is 
almost certain that he will finally hit on the wrong prescription. 


Were this not so, there could be no explanation for the political 
achievements of our highly-placed government officials, unless we assume that 
they are due to malice and chicanery rather than to pathological weakness. 


On the other hand, a man who has cultivated the art of reading will 
instantly discern, in a book, a journal or a pamphlet, what ought to be 
remembered because it meets his personal needs or is of value as general 
knowledge. 


What he thus learns is incorporated in his mental conception of this or 
that problem or thing, further correcting the mental picture or enlarging it so 
that it becomes more exact and precise. Should some practical problem 
suddenly demand examination or solution, memory will immediately select the 
requisite information from the mass that has been acquired through years of 
reading and will place this information at the service of a man’s powers of 
judgment so he may gain a new and clearer view of the problem, or even solve 
it. 


Only thus can reading have any meaning or value. 


The speaker, for example, who has not the sources of information ready 
to hand which are necessary to a proper treatment of his subject, is unable to 
defend his opinions against an opponent, even though those opinions be 
perfectly sound and true. 


In every discussion his memory will leave him shamefully in the lurch. 
He cannot summon up arguments to support his statements or to refute his 
opponent. So long as the speaker has only to defend himself on his own 
personal account, the situation is not serious, but the evil arises when Fate 
places at the head of public affairs such a soi-disant know-all, who in reality 
knows nothing. 


From early youth I endeavoured to read books in the right way and I was 
fortunate in having a good memory and intelligence to assist me. From that 
point of view my sojourn in Vienna was particularly useful and profitable. My 
daily experiences there were a constant stimulus to study the most diverse 


49 


problems from new angles. 


Inasmuch as I was in a position to put theory to the test of reality and 
reality to the test of theory, I was safe from the danger of losing myself ina 
haze of theories on the one hand, and of becoming superficial, on the other. 


My everyday experiences at that time made me determined to make a 
fundamental theoretical study of two most important questions, apart from the 
social question. It is impossible to say when I might have started to make a 
thorough study of the doctrine and characteristics of Marxism, were it not for 
the fact that I then literally pitched head foremost into the problem. 


What I knew of Social Democracy in my youth was precious little and 
that little was for the most part wrong. The fact that it led the struggle for 
universal suffrage and the secret ballot gave me an inner satisfaction, for my 
reason then told me that this would weaken the Habsburg regime, which I so 
thoroughly detested. 


I was convinced that except at the cost of sacrificing the German 
element, the Danubian State could not continue to exist. Even a long and steady 
Slavisation of the Austrian Germans would not have constituted a guarantee 
that the Empire would endure, because it was very questionable if, and how 
far, the Slays possessed the necessary capacity for preserving the State as such. 
Therefore, I welcomed every movement that might lead towards the final 
disruption of that impossible State which, to continue to exist, would have to 
stamp out the German character in ten million people. 


The more this babel of tongues wrought discord and disruption, even in 
the parliament, the nearer did the hour approach for the dissolution of this 
Babylonian Empire. That would mean the liberation of my German-Austrian 
people and only then would it become possible for them to be re-united with 
the mother country. 


Accordingly, I had no feeling of antipathy towards the actual policy of 
the Social Democrats. That its avowed purpose was to raise the level of the 
working classes (which, in my ignorance, I then foolishly believed) was a 
further point in favour of Social Democracy rather than against it,) but the 
feature that contributed most to estrange me from the Social Democratic 
movement was its hostile attitude towards the struggle for the preservation of 
Germanism in Austria and its undignified wooing of the Slav ‘comrades,’ who 
received these approaches favourably as long as any, practical advantages 


50 


were forthcoming, but otherwise maintained a haughty reserve, thus giving the 
suitors the answer their behaviour deserved. 


So it happened that, at the age of seventeen, the word ‘Marxism’ was 
very little known to me, while I looked on ‘Social Democracy’ and ‘Socialism’ 
as Synonymous expressions. It was only as the result of a sudden blow from the 
rough hand of Fate that my eyes were opened to the nature of this unparalleled 
system of duping the public. 


Hitherto my acquaintance with the Social Democratic Party had only 
been that of a mere spectator at some of their mass meetings. I had not the 
slightest idea of the Social Democratic doctrine or of the mentality of its 
partisans but now was suddenly brought face to face with the products of its 
teaching and what was called its Weltanschauung. 


In this way a few months sufficed for me to learn something which in 
other circumstances might have required years of study namely, that under the 
cloak of social virtue and love of one’s neighbour a veritable pestilence was 
spreading abroad and that if this pestilence were not stamped out without delay 
it might eventually succeed in exterminating the human race. 


I first came into contact with the Social Democrats while working in the 
building trade. From the very moment I started work the situation was not very 
pleasant for me. My clothes were still rather decent, I was careful of my 
speech and I was reserved in manner. 


I was so occupied with thinking of my own present lot and future 
prospects that I did not take much interest in my immediate surroundings. I had 
sought work so that I should not starve and at the same time so as to be able to 
make further headway with my studies, though this headway might be slow. 


Possibly I should not have bothered about my companions had it not been 
that on the third or fourth day an event occurred which forced me to take a 
definite stand. I was called upon to join the trade-union. 


At that time I knew nothing about the trade-unions. I had had no 
opportunity of forming an opinion on their utility or inutility, as the case might 
be, but when I was told that I must join the union, I refused. 


The grounds which I gave for my refusal were simply that I knew nothing 
about the matter and that anyhow I would not allow myself to be forced into 
anything. Probably the former reason saved me from being thrown out right 


51 


away. 


They probably thought that within a few days I might be converted or 
become more docile, but if they thought so, they were profoundly mistaken. 
After two weeks I found it utterly impossible for me to take such a step, even if 
I had been willing to take it at first. 


During those fourteen days I came to know my fellow workmen better, 
and no power in the world could have moved me to join an organisation whose 
representatives had meanwhile shown themselves in a light which I found so 
unfavourable. 


At first, my resentment was aroused. At midday some, of my fellow, 
workers used to adjourn to the nearest tavern, while the others remained on the 
building premises and there ate their midday meal, which was in most cases a 
very scanty one. These were the married men whose wives brought them their 
midday soup in dilapidated vessels. Towards the end of the week there was a 
gradual increase in the number of those who remained to eat their midday meal 
on the building premises. I understood the reason for this afterwards. They 
now talked politics. 


I drank my bottle of milk and ate my morsel of bread somewhat apart 
from the others, while I circumspectly studied my environment or else fell to 
meditating on my own harsh lot. Yet I heard more than enough, and I often 
thought that much of what they said was meant for my ears, in the hope of 
making me adopt a definite attitude, but all that I heard had the effect of 
arousing the strongest antagonism in me. 


Everything was disparaged the nation, because it was held to be an 
invention of the ‘capitalist’ class (how often I had to listen to that phrase!); the 
Fatherland, because it was held to be an instrument in the hands of the 
bourgeoisie for the exploitation of the working classes; the authority of the law, 
because that was a means of oppressing the proletariat; the school system, as a 
means of training not only slaves, but also slave-drivers; religion, as a means 
of doping the people, in order to exploit them afterwards; morality, as the 
badge of stupid and sheepish docility. There was nothing that they did not drag 
in the mud. 


At first I remained silent, but that could not last very long. Then I began 
to take part in the discussion and to reply to their statements. I had to 
recognise, however, that this was bound to be entirely fruitless, as long as I did 


a2 


not have at least a certain amount of definite information about the questions 
that were discussed. 


I therefore decided to consult the sources from which they claimed to 
have drawn their so-called wisdom, and, with this end in view, I studied book 
after book, pamphlet after pamphlet. 


Meanwhile, we argued with one another on the building premises. Day 
by day I was becoming better informed than my companions on the subjects on 
which they claimed to be informed. 


Then a day came when the more redoubtable of my adversaries resorted 
to the most effective weapon they had to replace the force of reason, namely, 
intimidation and physical force. Some of the leaders among my adversaries 
ordered me to leave the building or else allow myself to be flung off the 
scaffolding. 


As I was quite alone I could not put up any effective resistance, so I 
chose the first alternative and departed, having, however, learned a lesson. 


I went away full of disgust, but at the same time so deeply moved that it 
was quite impossible for me to turn my back on the whole situation and think 
no more about it. When my anger began to calm down, the spirit of obstinacy 
got the upper hand and I decided that at all costs I would get back to work 
again, in the building trade. 


This decision became all the stronger a few weeks later, when my little 
savings had entirely run out and hunger clutched me once again in its merciless 
grip. I had no alternative. I got work again and had to leave for the same 
reasons as before. 


I tortured myself with the question, ‘Are these men worthy to belong to a 
great people?’ The question is profoundly disturbing, for if the answer 1s in the 
affirmative, then the struggle to defend one’s nationality is no longer worth all 
the trouble and sacrifice we demand of our best elements if it be on behalf of 
such a rabble. 


On the other hand, if the answer is in the negative, then our nation is poor 
in human material. After days spent in such meditation and introspection, I was 
depressed and saw before my mind’s eye the ever-increasing and menacing 
army of people who could no longer be reckoned as belonging to their own 
nation. 


53 


It was with changed feelings, that, some days later, I gazed on the 
interminable ranks of Viennese workmen parading four abreast, at a mass 
demonstration. I stood dumbfounded for almost two hours, watching that 
enormous human dragon which slowly uncoiled itself there before me. When I 
finally left the square and wandered in the direction of my lodgings I felt 
dismayed and depressed. 


On my way I noticed the Arbeiterzeitung (“The Workers’ Journal’’) ina 
tobacco shop. This was the chief press-organ of the old Austrian Social 
Democracy. In a cheap cafe, where the common people used to forgather and 
where I often went to read the papers, the Arbeiterzeitung was also displayed. 


Hitherto I had not been able to bring myself to do more than glance at the 
wretched thing for a couple of minutes, for its whole tone was a sort of mental 
vitriol to me. Under the depressing influence of the demonstration I had 
witnessed, some interior voice urged me to buy the paper in that tobacco shop 
and read it through. 


So I took it home with me and spent a whole evening reading it, despite 
the steadily mounting rage provoked by this ceaseless outpouring of 
falsehoods. 


I now found that in the social democratic daily papers I could study the 
inner character of this movement much better than in all their theoretical 
literature. 


What a discrepancy between the two, between the literary effusions 
which dealt with the theory of Social Democracy and their high-sounding 
phraseology about liberty, human dignity and beauty, the air of profound 
wisdom, the disgusting moral pose and the brazen prophetic assurance—a 
meticulously woven glitter of words, to dazzle and mislead the reader and, on 
the other hand, the daily press spreading this new doctrine of human 
redemption in the most vile fashion! 


No means was too base, provided it could be exploited in the campaign 
of slander. These journalists were real virtuosos in the art of twisting facts and 
presenting them in a deceptive form. The theoretical literature was intended for 
the simpletons of the soi-disant intelligentsia of the middle and upper classes. 
The newspaper propaganda was intended for the masses. 


This probing into books and newspapers and the study of the teachings of 


54 


Social Democracy reawakened my love for my own, people, and thus what at 
first seemed an impassable gulf became the occasion of a closer affection. 


Having once understood the working of the colossal system for 
poisoning the popular mind, only a fool could blame the victims of it. During 
the years that followed I became more independent, and as I did so, I became 
better able to understand the inner cause of the success achieved by this Social 
Democratic gospel. 


I now realised the meaning and purpose of those brutal orders which 
prohibited the reading of all books and newspapers that were not ‘Red’ and at 
the same time demanded that only the ‘Red’ meetings should be attended. In the 
clear light of reality I was able to see what must have been the inevitable 
consequences of that intolerant teaching. 


The mentality of the broad masses is accessible only to what is strong 
and uncompromising. Like woman whose inner sensibilities are not under the 
sway of abstract reasoning, but are always subject to the influence of a vague 
emotional longing for the strength that completes her being, and who would 
rather bow to the strong man than dominate the weakling—in like manner the 
masses of the people prefer the ruler to the suppliant, and are well-led witha 
stronger sense of mental security by a teaching that brooks no rival, than by one 
which offers them a liberal freedom. 


They have very little idea of how to use that freedom, and thus they are 
prone to feel that they have been abandoned. They feel very little shame at 
being terrorised intellectually and they are scarcely conscious of the fact that 
their freedom as human beings is impudently abused, nor have they the slightest 
suspicion of the intrinsic fallacy of the whole doctrine. They see only the 
ruthless force and brutality of its determined utterances, to which they always 
submit. 


If Social Democracy is opposed by a more truthful teaching, then, even 
though the struggle be of the most bitter kind, this truthful teaching will finally 
prevail, provided it be enforced with equal ruthlessness. 


Within less than two years I had gained a clear understanding of Social 
Democracy, its teaching and its weapons. 


I recognised the infamy of that technique whereby the movement carried 
on a campaign of mental terrorism against the bourgeoisie, which is neither 


5D 


morally nor spiritually equipped to withstand such attacks. The tactics of 
Social Democracy consisted in opening, at a given signal, a veritable barrage 
of lies and calumnies against the man whom they believed to be the most 
redoubtable of their adversaries, until the nerves of the bourgeoisie gave way 
and they sacrificed the man who was attacked, simply in the hope of being 
allowed to live in peace. 


But the hope always proved to be a foolish one for they were never left 
in peace. The same tactics were repeated again and again, until fear of these 
ruthless fanatics exercised, by sheer force of suggestion, a paralysing effect on 
their victims. Through its own experience, Social Democracy learned the value 
of strength and for that reason it attacks mostly those in whom it senses real 
mettle, which is indeed a very rare possession. 


On the other hand, it praises every weakling among its adversaries, more 
or less cautiously according to the measure of his mental qualities, known or 
assumed. They have less fear of a man of genius who lacks will-power, than of 
a vigorous character of mediocre intelligence, and at the same time they highly 
commend those who are devoid of both intelligence and will-power. 


The Social Democrats know how to create the impression that they alone 
are the protectors of peace. In this way, acting very circumspectly, but never 
losing sight of their ultimate goal, they conquer one position after another, at 
one time by methods of quiet intimidation, and at another, by sheer daylight 
robbery, employing these latter tactics at those moments when public attention 
is turned towards other matters from which it does not wish to be diverted, or 
when the public considers an incident too trivial to create a scandal and thus 
provoke the anger of a malignant opponent. 


These tactics are based on an accurate estimation of human frailties and 
must lead to success, with almost mathematical certainty, unless the other side 
also learns how to fight poison gas with poison gas. Weaker elements must be 
told that here it is a question of to be or not to be. 


I also came to understand that physical intimidation has its significance 
for the mass as well as for the individual. Here again, the psychological effect 
has been calculated to a nicety. Intimidation in workshops and in factories, in 
assembly halls and at mass demonstrations, will always meet with success as 
long as it does not have to encounter the same kind of intimidation in a stronger 
form. 


56 


Then, of course, the Social Democratic Party will raise a horrified 
outcry and appeal to the authority of the State, which it has just repudiated and 
will, in most cases, quietly achieve its aim amid the general confusion, namely, 
to discover some bovine creature holding an important government position, 
who, in a vain attempt to curry favour with the dreaded opponent in case of 
future trouble, is ready to finish off those who dare to oppose this world 
enemy. 


The impression which such successful tactics makes on the minds of the 
broad masses, whether they be adherents or opponents, can be estimated only 
by one who knows the popular mind, not from books, but from practical life, 
for the successes which are thus obtained are taken by the adherents of Social 
Democracy as a triumph of the righteousness of their own cause; on the other 
hand, the beaten opponent very often loses faith in the effectiveness of any 
further resistance. 


The more I understood the methods of physical intimidation that were 
employed, the more sympathy I had for the multitude that had succumbed to it. I 
am thankful now for the ordeal which I had to go through at that time; for it was 
the means of bringing me to think kindly again of my own people, inasmuch as 
the experience enabled me to distinguish between the false leaders and the 
victims who have been led astray, for those who had been misled in this way 
can only be described as victims. 


If I attempted to give a faithful picture of those on the lowest rung of the 
social ladder, my picture would be incomplete, if I did not add that even in the 
social depths I still found light in the shape ofa rare spirit of self-sacrifice and 
loyal comradeship, contentment and a modest reserve. 


This was true especially of the older generation of workmen. Although 
these qualities were disappearing more and more in the younger generation, 
owing to the all-pervading influence of the big city, yet among the younger 
generation also, there were many who were fundamentally sound and who 
were able to maintain themselves uncontaminated amid the sordid surroundings 
of their everyday existence. 


If these men, who in many cases meant well and were upright in 
themselves, were, as far as their political activities were concerned, in the 
ranks of the mortal enemy of our people, that was because they, as decent 
workpeople did not and could not grasp the downright infamy of the doctrine 


a7. 


taught by the socialist agitators. 


Furthermore, it was because no other section of the community bothered 
itself about the lot of the working classes, and social conditions finally proved 
more powerful than any feelings which might have led them to adopt a different 
attitude. A day was bound to come when want gained the upper hand and drove 
them to join, the Social Democrats. 


On innumerable occasions the bourgeoisie took a definite stand against 
even the most legitimate human demands of the working classes. This line of 
conduct was not only ill-judged and indeed immoral, but the bourgeoisie did 
not even stand to gain by it. The result was that even the honest workman 
abandoned the original concept of the trade-union organisation and was 
dragged into politics. 


There were millions of workmen who began by being hostile to the 
Social Democratic Party, but their defences were repeatedly stormed and 
finally they had to surrender. Yet this defeat was due to the stupidity of the 
bourgeois parties, who had opposed every social demand put forward by the 
working classes. The short-sighted refusal to support attempts to improve 
labour conditions, the refusal to adopt measures for the prevention of accidents 
in the factories, the refusal to forbid child labour, the refusal to consider 
protective measures for female workers, especially expectant mothers—all 
this was of assistance to the Social Democratic leaders, who were thankful for 
every opportunity which they could exploit for forcing the masses into their 
net. 


Our bourgeois parties can never repair the damage that resulted from the 
mistake they then made, for they sowed the seeds of hatred when they opposed 
all efforts at social, reform and thus, to all outward appearances, at least, lent 
colour to the claim put forward by the arch-enemy of our people: that only the 
Social Democrats protected. 


In this way it provided the moral justification of the actual existence of 
the trade-union, which was, from the outset, the chief political recruiting 
ground for the Social Democratic Party. 


During those years in Vienna, I was forced, whether I liked it or not, to 
decide on the attitude I should take towards the trade-union. Because I looked 
upon them as inseparable from the Social Democratic Party, my decision was 
hasty and mistaken. I repudiated them as a matter of course, but on this, 


58 


essential question, too, Fate intervened and gave me a lesson, with the result 
that I changed the opinion which I had first formed. 


When I was twenty years old I had learned to distinguish between the 
trade-union as a means of defending the social rights of the employees and of 
fighting for better living conditions for them and, on the other hand, the trade- 
union as a political instrument used by the party in the class struggle. 


The fact that the Social Democrats grasped the enormous importance of 
the trade-union movement, secured for them a weapon which they used with 
success, whereas the bourgeois parties by their failure to understand it, lost 
their political prestige. 


They thought that their own arrogant ‘veto’ would arrest the logical 
development of the movement, but what they actually did was to produce an 
illogical development. It is absurd and also untrue to say that the trade-union 
movement was in itself hostile to the nation. 


To maintain the opposite would be more correct. If the activities of the 
trade-union are directed towards improving the condition of a class, which is a 
mainstay of the nation, and succeed in doing so, such activities are not directed 
against the Fatherland or the State but are, in the truest sense of the word, 
national. 


In that way, the trade-union organisation helps to create the social 
conditions which are indispensable in a general system of national education. 
It deserves high recognition when it destroys the psychological and physical 
germs of social disease and thus contributes to the general welfare of the 
nation. It is, therefore, superfluous to ask whether the trade-union is 
indispensable. So long as there are employers who lack social understanding 
and have false ideas of justice and fair play, it is not only the right, but also the 
duty, of their employees (who are, after all, an integral part of our people) to 
protect the general interests against the greed and unreason of the individual. 


To safeguard the loyalty and confidence of the people is as much in the 
interests of the nation as to safeguard public health. Both are seriously 
menaced by dishonourable employers who are not conscious of their duty as 
members of the national community. 


Their personal avidity or ruthlessness sows the seeds of future trouble. 
To eliminate the causes of such a development is an action that deserves the 


59 


approbation of the country, and not the reverse. 


It is useless to argue that the individual workman is free at any time to 
escape from the consequences of an injustice which he has actually suffered, or 
thinks he has suffered, at the hands of an employer—in other words, he can 
leave. That argument is only a ruse to distract attention from the question at 
issue. 


Is it, or 1s it not, in the interests of the nation to remove the causes of 
social unrest? If it is, then the fight must be carried on with the only weapons 
that promise success. 


The individual workman is never ina position to stand up against the 
might of the big employer, for the question here is not one that concerns the 
triumph of right since, if right had been recognised as the guiding principle, the 
conflict could not have arisen at all. 


But here it 1s a question of who is the stronger. If it were otherwise, a 
sense of justice would, in itself, lead to an honourable settlement of the 
dispute, or, to put the case more correctly, such a dispute would never have 
arisen. 


If unsocial and dishonourable treatment of men provokes resistance, then 
the stronger party will win through in the conflict, until the constitutional 
legislative authorities do away with the evil through legislation. 


Therefore it is evident that, only if the individual workmen combine 
against the individual employer as representing the concentrated force of the 
undertaking, can they hope not to be doomed to defeat from the outset. 


Thus the trade-unions can help to inculcate and strengthen a sense of 
social responsibility in daily life and open the way to practical results. In 
doing this they tend to remove those causes of friction which are a continual 
source of discontent and complaint. 


The blame for the fact that the trade-unions do not fulfil this much- 
desired function must be laid at the doors of those who barred the road to 
legislative social reform, or rendered such a reform ineffective by sabotaging 
it through their political influence. Since the political bourgeoisie failed to 
understand—or, rather, did not wish to understand—the importance of the 
trade-union movement, the Social Democrats seized the advantage offered 
them by this mistaken policy and took the trade-unions under their exclusive 


60 


protection, without any protest from the other side. 


In this way they established for themselves a solid bulwark behind 
which they could safely retire whenever the struggle assumed a critical aspect. 
Thus the genuine purpose of the movement gradually fell into oblivion, and 
was replaced by new objectives, for the Social Democrats never have, the 
slightest intention of upholding the original purpose for which the trade-union 
movement was founded. 


Within a, few decades the trade-union movement was transformed, by the 
expert hand of Social Democracy, from an instrument which had been 
originally fashioned for the defence of human rights into an instrument for the 
destruction of the national economic structure. 


The interests of the working class were not for one moment permitted to 
interfere with this aim, for, in the political sphere the application of economic 
pressure always renders extortion, successful, if the one side be sufficiently 
unscrupulous and the other sufficiently inert and docile. In this case both these 
conditions were fulfilled. 


By the beginning of the present century the trade-unionist movement had 
already ceased to serve the purpose for which it had been founded. From year 
to year it fell more and more under the political control of the Social 
Democrats, until it finally came to be used solely as a battering-ram in the 
class struggle. 


The plan was to shatter, by means of constantly repeated blows, the 
economic edifice on the building of which so much time and care had been 
expended. Once this objective had been reached, the destruction of the State 
would become easier, because the State would already have been deprived of 
its economic foundations. 


It became less and less a question of protecting the real interests of the 
workers, until political acumen no longer deemed it advisable to supply the 
social and cultural needs of the broad masses, Since there was a danger that if 
these masses once felt content they could no longer be employed as mere 
passive material in the political struggle. 


The, mere prospect of such a development caused such anxiety among 
the leaders in the class-warfare, that they eventually rejected and inveighed 
against every genuinely beneficial social reform, and conditions were such that 


61 


these leaders did not have to trouble to justify such an illogical policy. 


As the masses were taught to increase and raise their demands, the 
possibility of satisfying them dwindled, and whatever ameliorative measures 
were taken seemed less and less significant, so that it was always possible to 
persuade the masses that this ridiculous degree in which the most sacred 
claims of the working classes were being granted, represented a diabolical 
plane to weaken their fighting power and, if possible, to paralyse it. In view of 
the limited thinking capacity of the broad masses, the success achieved is not 
to be wondered at. 


In the bourgeois camp there was high indignation over the dishonesty of 
the Social Democratic tactics, but not even the most tentative steps were taken 
to lay down guiding principles for their own line of conduct in the light of this. 


The refusal of the Social Democrats, to improve the miserable living 
conditions of the working classes, ought to have induced the bourgeois parties 
to make the most energetic efforts in this direction and to snatch from the hands 
of the class-warfare leaders their most precious weapon; but nothing of this 
kind happened. 


Instead of attacking the position of its adversaries the bourgeoisie 
allowed itself to be pressed and hurried. Finally, it adopted means that were so 
tardy and so insignificant that they were ineffective and were rejected. So the 
whole situation remained just as it had been before the bourgeois intervention, 
except that the discontent had increased. 


Like a threatening storm, the ‘free trade-union’ hung above the political 
horizon and overshadowed the life of each individual, It was one of the most 
frightful instruments of terror that threatened the security and independence of 
the national economic structure, the stability of the State and the liberty of the 
individual. 


Above all, it was the ‘free trade-union’ that turned democracy into a 
ridiculous term, insulted the ideal of liberty and derided that of fraternity with 
the slogan, ‘If you won’t become one of us, we’ll crack your skull.’ 


Thus did I come to know this friend of humanity. During the years that 
followed, my knowledge was widened and deepened, but I never felt called 
upon to alter my original opinion. The more became acquainted with the 
external forms of Social Democracy, the greater became my desire to 


62 


understand the inner nature of its doctrines. 


For this purpose the official literature of the party was of little use. In 
discussing economic questions, its statements were false and its proofs 
unsound. In treating of political aims its attitude was insincere. 


Furthermore, its modern methods of chicanery in the presentation of its 
arguments were profoundly repugnant to me. Its flamboyant sentences, its 
obscure and incomprehensible phrases, pretended to contain great thoughts, but 
they were devoid of meaning. 


One would have had to be a decadent Bohemian in one of our modern 
cities in order to feel at home in that labyrinth of nonsense, or enjoy ‘intimate 
experiences’ amid the stinking fumes of this literary Dadaism. These writers 
were obviously counting on the proverbial humility of a certain section of our 
people, who believe that a person who is incomprehensible must be 
profoundly wise. 


By comparing the theoretical falsity and absurdity of that doctrine with 
the reality of its external manifestations, I gradually came to have a clear idea 
of its final aims. During such moments | had dark presentiments and feared 
something evil. I had before me a teaching inspired by egotism and hatred, 
calculated to win its victory, the winning of which would be a mortal blow to 
humanity. 


Meanwhile, I had discovered the relationship existing between this 
destructive teaching and the specific character of a people, who up to that time 
had been to me almost unknown. 


Knowledge of the Jews is the only key to a true understanding of the 
inner nature, and, therefore, the real aims, of Social Democracy. 


The man who has come to know this race has succeeded in removing 
from his eyes the veil through which he had seen the aims and meaning of this 
party in a false light; then, out of the murk and fog of socialist talk rises the 
grimacing spectre of Marxism. 


To-day it is hard, and almost impossible, for me to say when the word 
‘Jew’ first began to have any particular significance for me. I do not remember 
ever having heard the word at home during my father’s lifetime. If this word 
had been used with a particular inflection I think the old gentleman would have 
considered those who used it in this way as being “behind the times.’ 


63 


In the course of his career he had, despite his pronounced nationalist 
tendencies, come to be more or less of a cosmopolitan, and this had not been 
without its effect on me. In school, too, I found no reason to alter the picture I 
had formed at home. 


At the Realschule I knew one Jewish boy. We were all on our guard in 
our relations with him, but only because his reticence and certain actions of his 
warned us to be discreet. Beyond that, my companions and myself formed no 
particular opinion regarding him. 


It was not until I was fourteen or fifteen years old that I frequently ran up 
against the word ‘Jew,’ partly in connection with political controversies. 
These references aroused a slight aversion in me, and I could not avoid an 
uncomfortable feeling which always came over me when I had to listen to 
religious disputes. But, at that time, I did not see the Jewish question in any 
other light. 


There were very few Jews in Linz. In the course of centuries the Jews 
who lived there had become Europeanized and so civilised in appearance that 
I even looked upon them as Germans. The reason why I did not then perceive 
the absurdity of such an illusion was that the only thing which I recognised as 
distinguishing them from us was the practice of their strange religion. As I 
thought that they were persecuted on account of their faith my aversion to 
hearing remarks against them grew almost into a feeling of horror. I did not in 
the least suspect that there could be such a thing as systematic anti-Semitism. 


Such were the views I held when I went to Vienna. 


Confused by the mass of impressions I received from the architectural 
surroundings, and depressed by my own troubles, I did not at first distinguish 
between the different social strata of which the population of that mammoth 
city was composed. 


Although Vienna then had about two hundred thousand Jews among its 
population of two millions, I did not notice them. 


During the first weeks of my sojourn, my eyes and my mind were unable 
to cope with the onrush of new ideas and values. 


Not until I had gradually settled down in my new surroundings, and the 
confused picture began to grow clearer, did I gain a closer insight into my new 
world, and with that I came up against the Jewish problem. 


64 


I will not say that the manner in which I first became acquainted with it 
was particularly pleasant. In the Jew I still saw a man who was of a different 
religion, and, therefore, on grounds of human tolerance, I was against the idea 
that he should be attacked because he had a different faith. 


Consequently I considered that the tone adopted by the anti-Semitic press 
in Vienna was unworthy of the cultural traditions of a great people. The 
memory of certain events which happened in the Middle Ages came to my 
mind, and I felt that I should not like to see them repeated. 


Generally speaking, these anti-Semitic newspapers were not regarded as 
belonging to the first rank (but I did not then understand the reason of this) and 
so I regarded them as the products of jealousy and envy rather than as the 
expression of a sincere, though wrong-headed, feeling. 


My own opinions were confirmed by what I considered to be the 
infinitely more dignified manner in which the really important papers replied 
to these attacks or simply ignored them, which latter seemed to me the better 
way. 


I diligently read what was generally called the world press—Neue Freie 
Presse, Wiener Tageblatt, etc —and I was astonished by the abundance of 
information these gave their readers and the impartial way in which they 
presented particular problems. 


I appreciated their dignified tone, although sometimes the flamboyancy 
of the style was unconvincing, and I did not like it. All this, however, might be 
attributed to the atmosphere of the metropolis. 


Since, at that time, I considered Vienna to be such, I thought this 
constituted sufficient grounds to excuse these shortcomings of the press, but I 
was frequently disgusted by the grovelling way in which the Viennese press 
played lackey to the Court. Scarcely a move took place at the Hofburg which 
was not presented in glorified colours to the readers. There was such a fuss, 
especially when it was a question of ‘the wisest monarch of all times,’ that one 
was reminded of the antics of the mountain-cock at mating time. It all seemed 
artificial, and to my mind, unworthy of liberal democracy. 


I thought that this cheap way of currying favour at the Court belittled the 
dignity of the nation, and that was the first shadow that fell on my appreciation 
of the great Viennese press. 


65 


While in Vienna I continued to follow with a vivid interest all the events 
that were taking place in Germany, whether connected with political or with 
cultural questions. I had a feeling of pride and admiration when I compared the 
rise of the young German Reich with the decline of the Austrian State. 


But, although the foreign policy of that Reich was a source of real 
pleasure on the whole, the internal political happenings were not always so 
satisfactory. I did not approve of the campaign which, at that time, was being 
carried on against Wilhelm II. 


I looked upon him not only as the German Emperor but, above all, as the 
creator of the German Navy. The fact that the Emperor was prohibited by the 
Reichstag from making political speeches, made me very angry, because the 
prohibition came from a quarter which, in my eyes, had no reason for doing so, 
for at a single sitting those same parliamentary ganders did more cackling than 
the whole dynasty of emperors, including even the weakest, could have done in 
the course of centuries. 


It annoyed me to have to acknowledge that in a nation where any half- 
witted fellow could claim for himself the right to criticise and might even be 
let loose on the people as a ‘legislator’ in the Reichstag, the wearer of the 
Imperial Crown could be the subject of a ‘reprimand’ on the part of the most 
miserable assembly of drivellers that had ever existed. 


I was even more disgusted at the way in which this same Viennese press 
salaamed obsequiously before the meanest steed belonging to the Habsburg 
royal stables and went off into wild ecstasies of delight if the nag wagged its 
tail in response. 


At the same time these newspapers took up an attitude of anxiety in 
matters that concerned the German Emperor, trying to cloak their enmity by the 
serious air of concern which they assumed. Naturally, they protested that they 
had no intention of interfering in Germany’s internal affairs—God forbid! 


They pretended that by touching a delicate spot in such a friendly way 
they were fulfilling a duty that devolved upon them by reason of the mutual 
alliance between the two countries and at the same time discharging their 
obligations of journalistic truthfulness. 


Having thus excused themselves about tenderly touching a sore spot, they 
probed the wound ruthlessly. 


66 


That sort of thing made my blood boil, and now I began to be more and 
more on my guard when reading the great Viennese press. 


I had to acknowledge however, that on such subjects, one of the anti- 
Semitic papers—Deutsches Volksblatt—acted with more dignity. What got 
still more on my nerves was the repugnant manner in which the big newspapers 
cultivated admiration for France. 


One really had to feel ashamed of being a German when confronted by 
those mellifluous hymns of praise for ‘the great cultured nation.’ This wretched 
Gallomania more often than once made me throw away one of these 
newspapers belonging to the ‘world press.’ 


I now often turned to the Volksblatt, which was much smaller in size, but 
which treated such subjects more decently I was not in accord with its sharply 
anti-Semitic tone, but again and again I found that its arguments gave me food 
for serious thought. 


Anyhow it was as a result of such reading that I came to know the man 
and the movement which then determined the fate of Vienna. These were Dr. 
Karl Lueger and the Christian Socialist Party. At the time I went to Vienna I felt 
opposed to both. I looked on both the man and the movement as reactionary. 


But even an elementary sense of justice forced me to change my opinion 
when I had an opportunity of knowing the man and his work; and slowly that 
opinion grew into outspoken admiration when I had better grounds for forming 
a judgment. To-day, as well as then, I respect Dr. Karl Lueger as the most 
eminent type of German Burgomaster. 


How many prejudices were overcome through such a change in my 
attitude towards the Christian Socialist Movement! 


My ideas about anti-Semitism changed also in the course of time, but that 
was the change which I found most difficult. It cost me a great internal conflict 
with myself, and it was only after months of struggle between reason and 
sentiment that the former gained the victory. 


Two years later sentiment rallied to the side of reason and became a 
faithful guardian and counsellor. At the time of this bitter inner struggle 
between calm reason and the sentiments in which I had been brought up, the 
lessons that I learned on the streets of Vienna were of invaluable assistance. 


67 


A time came when I no longer passed blindly along the streets of the 
mighty city, as I had done in the early days, but now with my eyes open, not 
only in order to study the buildings, but also the human beings. 


Once, when passing through the oldest part of the city, I suddenly 
encountered a creature in a long caftan and wearing black sidelocks. My first 
thought was, is this, then, a Jew? 


They certainly did not have this appearance in Linz. I watched the man 
stealthily and cautiously, but the longer I gazed at that strange countenance and 
examined it feature by feature, the more the question shaped itself in my brain, 
‘Is this, then, a German?’ 


As was always my habit with such experiences, I turned to books for 
help in removing my doubts. For the first time in my life I bought myself some 
anti-Semitic pamphlets, for a few pence, but unfortunately they all began with 
the assumption that the reader had at least a certain degree of information on 
the Jewish question or was even familiar with it. 


Moreover, the tone of most of these pamphlets was such that I became 
doubtful again, because the statements made were partly superficial and the 
proofs extraordinarily unconvincing. For weeks, and indeed for months, I 
returned to my old way of thinking. 


The subject appeared so enormous and the accusations were so far- 
reaching that I was afraid of being unjust and so I became again anxious and 
uncertain. 


Naturally, I could no longer doubt that here it was not a question of 
Germans who happened to be of a different religion, but rather that it was a 
question of an entirely different people, for as soon as I began to investigate 
the matter and observe the Jews, Vienna appeared to me in a different light. 


Wherever I now went, I saw Jews, and the more I saw of them the more 
strikingly and clearly they stood out as different from the other citizens. 
Especially the old part of the city and the district north of the Danube Canal 
swarmed with a people who, even in outer appearance bore no similarity to 
the Germans. 


Any indecision which I may still have felt about that point was finally 
removed by the activities of a certain section of the Jews themselves. 


68 


A great movement, called Zionism, the aim of which was to assert the 
national character of Judaism, was strongly represented in Vienna. 


To all outward appearances it seemed as if only one group of Jews 
championed this movement, while the great majority disapproved of it, or even 
repudiated it, but a closer investigation of the situation showed that since that 
part of Jewry which was styled ‘liberal’ did not disown the Zionists as if they 
were not member of their race, but rather as brother Jews who publicly 
professed their faith in an unpractical, and even, dangerous way, there was no 
real rift in their internal solidarity. 


This fictitious conflict between the Zionists and the ‘liberal’ Jews soon 
disgusted me; for it was false through and through and therefore in direct 
contradiction to the moral dignity and immaculate character on which that race 
had always prided itself. 


Cleanliness, whether moral or of another kind, had its own peculiar 
meaning for these people. That they were water-shy was obvious on looking at 
them and, unfortunately, very often even when not looking at them. The odour 
of those people in caftans often used to make me feel ill. Apart from that there 
were the unkempt clothes and the ignoble exterior. All these details were 
certainly not attractive, but the revolting feature was that beneath their unclean 
exterior one suddenly perceived the moral mildew of the chosen race. 


What soon gave me food for serious thought was the insight which I 
gradually gained into the activities of the Jews in certain walks of life. 


Was there any shady undertaking, any form of, foulness, especially in 
cultural life, in which at least one Jew did not participate? 


On probing to the heart of this kind of abomination, one discovered, like 
a maggot in a rotten body, a tiny Jew, who was apt to be blinded when thus 
exposed to the light of day. 


In my eyes the charge against Judaism became a grave one the moment I 
discovered the scope of Jewish activities in the press, in art, in literature and 
in the theatre. 


All unctuous protests were now more or less futile. One needed only to 
look at the posters and to study the names of the authors of the appalling 
productions advertised as being performed in the cinemas and theatres, in 
order to become hardened against the Jews. 


69 


Here was a pestilence, a moral pestilence, with which the public was 
being infected. It was worse than the black plague of long ago. And in what 
doses this poison was manufactured and distributed! 


Naturally, the lower the moral and intellectual level of such an author of 
‘artistic’ products, the more inexhaustible his fecundity, and at times it even 
seemed as though these creatures turned out their stuff like machines and hurled 
it at the public. In this connection we must remember there is no limit to the 
number of such writers. 


One ought to realise that for one Goethe, Nature may bring into existence 
ten thousand such scribblers who act as the worst kind of germ-carriers in 
poisoning human soul. It was a terrible thought, and yet one which could not be 
overlooked, that the greater number of the Jews seemed specially destined by 
Nature to play this shameful part. 


Was it for this reason that they were called the chosen people? I then 
began to investigate carefully the names of all the fabricators of these unclean 
products which played such a big part in the cultural life of the public. The 
result of that investigation was still more unfavourable to the attitude which I 
had hitherto held in regard to the Jews. 


Though my feelings might rebel a thousand times, reason now had to 
draw its own conclusions. 


The fact that nine-tenths of all the ‘smutty’ literature, artistic ‘tripe’ and 
theatrical banalities, had to be charged to the account of a people who formed 
scarcely one percent of the nation could not be gainsaid. It was there and had 
to be admitted. 


Then I began to examine my favourite ‘world press,’ with that fact before 
my mind. 


The deeper I probed, the more did the object of my former admiration 
lose its glory. Its style became still more repellent and I was forced to reject 
its subject-matter as entirely shallow and superficial. Its impartial attitude in 
the presentation of facts and views seemed to me to contain more falsehood 
than truth. The writers were—Jews. 


Thousands of details that I had scarcely noticed before seemed to me 
now to deserve attention. I began to grasp and understand things which had 
formerly puzzled me. I saw the liberal policy of that press in another light. Its 


70 


dignified tone in replying to the attacks of its adversaries and its dead silence 
in other cases now became clear to me as part of a cunning and despicable 
way of deceiving the readers. 


Its brilliant theatrical criticisms always praised the Jewish authors and 
its adverse criticism was reserved exclusively for the Germans. 


The slight pin-pricks against Wilhelm II showed the persistency of its 
policy, just as did its systematic commendation of French culture and 
civilisation. The subject-matter of the serial was trivial and often indecent. 
The language of this press as a whole had the accent of a foreign people. The 
general tone was so openly derogatory to the Germans that this must have been 
definitely intentional. 


To whose interest was this? Or was it mere chance? In attempting to find 
an answer to these questions I gradually became more and more dubious. 


The process was hastened by glimpses which I gained of another aspect 
of the case, namely, the general conception of manners and morals which was 
openly upheld and put into practice by a large section of the Jews. Here again 
the life which I observed in the streets taught me by living example. 


The part which the Jews played in the evil of prostitution, and more 
especially in the white slave traffic, could be studied here better than in any 
other Western European city, with the possible exception of certain ports in 
Southern France. 


Walking by night along the streets of the Leopoldstadt, almost at every 
turn, whether one wished it or not, one witnessed certain incidents of which the 
majority of Germans knew nothing until the War made it possible, and indeed 
inevitable, for the soldiers to see such things on the Eastern front. 


A cold shiver ran down my spine when I first ascertained that it was the 
cold-blooded and shameless Jew who showed his consummate skill in 
conducting a sordid and vicarious trade among the dregs of the big city. Then I 
was filled with wrath. 


I had now no more hesitation about investigating the Jewish problem in 
all its details. Henceforth, I was determined to do so, but as I learned to track 
down the Jew in all the different spheres of cultural and artistic life, and in the 
various manifestations of this life everywhere, I suddenly came upon him 
where I had least expected to find him. 


71 


I now realised that the Jews were the leaders of Social Democracy. In 
the face of that revelation the scales fell from my eyes. My long inner struggle 
was at an end. 


In my relations with my fellow-workmen I was often astonished to find 
how easily and how often they changed their opinions on the same question, 
sometimes within a few days and sometimes even within the course of a few 
hours. 


I found it difficult to understand how men, who always had reasonable 
ideas when I spoke to them as individuals, suddenly lost this reasonableness 
the moment they came under the influence of the mass. I was often on the verge 
of despair. 


When, after talking to them for hours, I was convinced that I had, at last 
broken the ice or made them see the error of their way of thinking, and was 
sincerely pleased, I would often find to my disgust that next day I had to begin 
all over again. All my efforts had been in vain. With pendulum-like regularity 
they swung back to their original opinions. 


I was able to understand their position fully. They were dissatisfied with 
their lot and cursed the fate which had hit them so hard. They hated their 
employers, whom they looked upon as the heartless agents of their cruel 
destiny. 


Often they used abusive language against the public officials, whom they 
accused of having no sympathy with the situation of the working people. They 
made public demonstrations against the cost of living and paraded through the 
streets in defence of their claims. 


At least all this could be explained in the light of reason, but what was 
impossible to understand was the boundless hatred they expressed against their 
own fellow-citizens, how they disparaged their own nation, mocked at its 
greatness, reviled its history and dragged the names of its most illustrious men 
in the gutter. 


This hostility towards their own kith and kin, their own native land and 
home was as irrational as it was incomprehensible. It was against Nature. 


One could cure that malady temporarily, but only for some days, or at 
most for some weeks, but on meeting those whom one believed to have been 
converted one found that they had reverted to their old way of thinking and 


eA 


were again the prey of perverse opinions. 


I gradually discovered that the Social Democratic press was mainly 
controlled by Jews, but I did not attach special importance to this 
circumstance, for the same was true of other newspapers. 


In this connection there was, however, one striking fact, namely, that 
there was not a single newspaper with which Jews were connected that could 
be spoken of as ‘national’ in the sense that I, with my education and 
convictions, used that word. 


Making an effort to overcome my natural reluctance, I tried to read 
articles published in the Marxist press. However, as my aversion increased 
tenfold, I set about learning something of the people who wrote and published 
this mischievous stuff—from the publisher downwards, all of them were Jews! 


I got hold of as many Social Democratic pamphlets as I could and looked 
up the names of the authors—Jews all! 


I noted the names of nearly all their leaders and most of them belonged to 
the chosen race, whether they were members of the Reichsrat (Imperial 
Council), trade-union secretaries, chairmen of various organisations or street 
agitators. 


Everywhere the same sinister picture presented itself. I shall never 
forget the list of names—Austerlitz, David, Adler, Ellenbogen, and others. 


One fact became quite evident to me, namely, that this alien race held in 
its hand the leadership of that Social Democratic Party with whose minor 
representatives I had been disputing for months past. I was happy at last to 
know for certain that the Jew was not a German. 


Thus I learnt to know thoroughly those who were leading our people 
astray. One year in Vienna had sufficed to convince me that no worker is so 
rooted in his preconceived notions that he will not surrender them in face of 
better and clearer arguments and explanations. 


Gradually I became an expert in the doctrine of the Marxists and used 
this knowledge as an instrument to drive home my own firm convictions. I was 
successful in nearly every case. 


The great masses can be rescued, but a lot of time and a great deal of 


73 


patience must be devoted to such work. A Jew, on the other hand, can never be 
rescued from his fixed notions. 


I was then simple enough to attempt to show them the absurdity of their 
teaching. Within my small circle I talked to them until my throat ached and my 
voice grew hoarse. I believed that I could finally convince them of the danger 
inherent in the Marxist nonsense. 


But I achieved the very opposite. It seemed to me that a growing insight 
into the disastrous effects of the Social Democratic doctrine in theory and in 
practice only served to strengthen their opposition. 


The more I debated with them the more familiar I became with their 
tactics in debate. At the outset they counted upon the stupidity of their 
opponents; but when they got so entangled that they could not find a way out, 
they played the trick of acting the innocent simpleton. 


Should they fail, in spite of their tricks of logic, they acted as if they 
could not understand the counter-arguments and feeling themselves cornered, 
hastily transferred the discussion to another field. They uttered truisms and 
platitudes; and, if you accepted these, took this acceptance as applying to other 
problems and matters differing essentially from the original theme. 


If you cornered them on this point they would escape again, and you 
could not force them to make any precise statement. 


Whenever one tried, to get a firm grip on any of these apostles, one’s 
hand grasped only a slimy jelly which slipped through the fingers, but 
coagulated again a moment afterwards. 


If your arguments were so telling that your adversary felt forced to give 
in on account of those listening and if you then thought that at last you had 
gained ground, a surprise was in store for you on the following day. 


The Jew would be utterly oblivious to what had happened the day 
before, and he would start once again by repeating his former absurdities, and 
if nothing had happened. 


Should you become indignant and remind him of yesterday’s defeat, he 
pretended astonishment and could not remember anything, except that on the 
previous day he had proved that his statements were correct. 


74 


Sometimes I was dumbfounded. I do not know what amazed me the more 
—their quickness in repartee or the artful way in which they dressed up their 
falsehoods. I gradually came to hate them. Yet all this had its good side, 
because the better I came to know the real leaders, or at least the propagators 
of Social Democracy, the more did my love for my own people increase 
accordingly. 


Considering the satanic skill which these evil counsellors displayed, 
who could blame their unfortunate victims? Indeed, I found it extremely 
difficult to prove a match for the dialectic perfidy of that race. 


How futile was it to try to win over such people, seeing that they 
distorted the truth, denied the very words they had just uttered and used them 
again a few moments afterwards to serve their own ends in argument! 


The better I came to know the Jew, the easier it was to excuse the 
workers. 


In my opinion the, most culpable were not to be found among the 
workers, but rather among those who did not think it worthwhile to take the 
trouble to sympathise with these, and in accordance with the iron law of justice 
to give to the hard-working son of the people what was his, while at the same 
time executing his seducer and corrupter. 


Moved by my own daily experiences, I now began to investigate more 
thoroughly the sources of the Marxist teaching itself. Its effects were well 
known to me in detail, one needed only a little imagination in order to be able 
to forecast the inevitable consequences. 


The only question now was, ‘Did the founders foresee the effects of their 
work in the form which it was eventually to assume, or were the founders 
themselves the victims of an error?’ 


To my mind both, alternatives were possible. 


If the second question had to be answered in the affirmative, then it was 
the duty of every thinking person to push his way into the forefront of this 
sinister movement with a view to preventing it from producing the worst 
possible results. 


But if it were the first question which had to be answered in the 
affirmative, then it must be admitted that the original authors of this evil which 


73 


has infected the nations were devils incarnate, for only the brain of a monster, 

and not that of a man, could plan an organisation whose activities must finally 
bring about the collapse of human civilisation and turn this world into a desert 
waste. 


Such being the case, the only alternative left was to fight, and in that fight 
to employ all the weapons which the human spirit, human intellect and human 
will could furnish, leaving it to Fate to decide in whose favour the balance 
should tilt. 


I began to gather information about the authors of this teaching, with a 
view to studying the principles of the movement. The fact that I attained my 
object sooner than I could have anticipated as due to the insight into the Jewish 
question which I had recently gained, slight though it was. 


This newly acquired knowledge alone enabled me to make a practical 
comparison between reality and the theoretical talk of the founders of Social 
Democracy, because I now understood the language of the Jew. 


I realised that the Jew uses language for the purpose of dissimulating his 
thoughts or at least veiling them, so that his real aim cannot be discovered in 
his words, but rather by reading between the lines. This was the moment at 
which my opinions underwent the greatest transformation which I had as yet 
experienced; from being a soft-hearted cosmopolitan I became ardently anti- 
Semitic. 

Only on one further occasion, and that for the last time: did I give way to 
oppressing thoughts which caused me some moments of profound anxiety. As I 
critically reviewed the activities of the Jewish people throughout long periods 
of history I became perplexed and asked myself whether, for inscrutable 
reasons beyond the comprehension of poor mortals such as ourselves, Destiny 
might not have irrevocably decreed that the final victory should go to this small 
people? 


May it not be that this people which lives only for the things of this earth 
has been promised the earth as a reward? 


Have we, from the objective point of view, a right to fight for self- 
preservation, or is this right subjective? 


Fate answered the question for me inasmuch as it led me to make a 
detached and exhaustive inquiry into the Marxist teaching and the activities of 


76 


the Jewish people in connection with it. The Jewish doctrine of Marxism 
repudiates the aristocratic principle of Nature and substitutes for the eternal 
right of might and strength, the dead weight of sheer numbers. Thus it denies 
the individual worth of the human personality, disputes the teaching that 
nationality and race are of primary significance, and by doing this deprives 
Man of the very foundations of his existence and civilisation. 


If the Marxist teaching were to be accepted as the foundation of the life 
of the universe, it would lead to the disappearance of all order that is 
conceivable to the human mind, and thus the adoption of such a law would 
provoke chaos in the structure of the greatest organism that we know, with the 
result that the inhabitants of this earthly planet would finally disappear. 


Should the Jew, with the aid of his Marxist creed, triumph over the 
peoples of this world, his crown will be the funeral, wreath of mankind, and 
this planet will once again follow its orbit through ether, devoid of human life, 
as it did millions of years ago. 


Nature, the eternal, takes merciless vengeance on those who defy her 
laws. Therefore, I believe to-day that my conduct is in accordance with the 
will of the Almighty Creator. In resisting the Jew I am defending the handiwork 
of the Lord. 


TT 


78 


79 


80 
